sk-SK: Zbaliteľnosť: Nezbaliteľné; Zbaliteľné do vlastného vrecka; Zbaliteľné do úložného vrecka; Iné
ro-RO: Compresibilitate: Nepliabil; Pliabil în propriul buzunar; Pliabil cu sac de depozitare; Altele
nb: Pakkbarhet: Kan ikke pakkes ned; Kan pakkes i egen lomme; Kan pakkes i oppbevaringspose; Annet
da: Pakbarhed: Kan ikke pakkes sammen; Kan pakkes i egen lomme; Kan pakkes med opbevaringstaske; Andet
hr-HR: Pakivost: Nije sklopivo; Pakira se u vlastiti džep; Pakira se s vrećom za pohranu; Ostalo
ko: 휴대성: 패킹 불가; 자체 주머니에 패킹 가능; 보관용 가방에 패킹 가능; 기타
sv: Packbarhet: Ej packbar; Packbar i egen ficka; Packbar med förvaringsväska; Övrigt
zh-CN: 可打包性: 不可打包; 可收纳至自带口袋; 带收纳袋; 其他
cs: Sbalitelnost: Nelze sbalit; Sbalitelné do vlastní kapsy; Sbalitelné do úložného obalu; Ostatní
hu: Csomagolhatóság: Nem összecsomagolható; Saját zsebébe csomagolható; Tárolótáskába csomagolható; Egyéb
fi: Pakattavuus: Ei pakattavissa; Pakattavissa omaan taskuunsa; Pakattavissa säilytyspussiin; Muu
vi: Khả năng đóng gói: Không thể gập gọn; Có thể gập gọn vào túi riêng; Có thể gập gọn kèm túi đựng; Khác
pl: Pakowność: Nieskładane; Składane do własnej kieszeni; Składane do pokrowca; Inne
lt-LT: Supakuojamumas: Nesupakuojamas; Supakuojamas į savo kišenę; Supakuojamas su laikymo krepšiu; Kita
ja: 携帯性: パッカブルではない; 自身のポケットに収納可能; 収納袋に収納可能; その他
it: Portabilità: Non ripiegabile; Ripiegabile nella propria tasca; Ripiegabile con custodia; Altro
el: Συσκευασιμότητα: Μη συσκευάσιμο; Διπλώνεται στην τσέπη του; Συσκευάζεται με τσάντα αποθήκευσης; Άλλο
pt-PT: Capacidade de compactação: Não compactável; Pode ser guardado no próprio bolso; Pode ser guardado no saco de arrumação; Outro
es: Capacidad de plegado: No empacable; Se puede guardar en su propio bolsillo; Empacable con bolsa de almacenamiento; Otro
pt-BR: Compactabilidade: Não compactável; Compactável no próprio bolso; Compactável com bolsa de armazenamento; Outros
fr: Capacité de rangement: Non compactable; Compactable dans sa propre poche; Compactable avec sac de rangement; Autre
en: Packability: Not packable; Packable into own pocket; Packable with storage bag; Other
nl: Inpakbaarheid: Niet opvouwbaar; Opvouwbaar in eigen zak; Opvouwbaar met opbergtas; Overige
sl-SI: Zložljivost: Ni zložljivo; Zložljivo v lasten žep; Zložljivo v vrečko za shranjevanje; Drugo
de: Packmaß: Nicht verstaubar; In eigener Tasche verstaubar; Mit Aufbewahrungstasche verstaubar; Sonstige
tr: Paketlenebilirlik: Katlanıp paketlenemez; Kendi cebine katlanabilir; Saklama çantasıyla katlanabilir; Diğer
zh-TW: 可收納性: 不可收納; 可收納至自身口袋中; 附收納袋可收納; 其他
ru: Компактность при хранении: Не упаковывается; Сворачивается в собственный карман; Сворачивается в сумку для хранения; Другое
th: ความสามารถในการบรรจุ: พับเก็บไม่ได้; พับเก็บในกระเป๋าตัวเองได้; พับเก็บในถุงจัดเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Компактност при съхранение: Не се сгъва; Сгъва се в собствен джоб; Сгъва се в чанта за съхранение; Друго